src/orthography/downcase-derived_proper-strings.xfscript
# Make initial downcasing after the misnamed U.Cap.Opt
# This gives oslolaš across the board
# like Pariisi -> pariisilainen

# ---- starts here: ------

define compoundtag  [ %+SgCmp       | %+SgNomCmp       | %+SgGenCmp       | %+PlGenCmp
					| %+CmpN%/First | %+CmpN%/Last     | %+CmpN%/None     | %+CmpN%/Only
					| %+CmpN%/SgLeft| %+CmpN%/SgNomLeft| %+CmpN%/SgGenLeft| %+CmpN%/PlGenLeft
					| %+CmpN%/All   | %+CmpN%/Def      | %+CmpN%/DefSgGen | %+CmpN%/DefPlGen
					] ;

define Flag       "@U.Cap.Opt@"      ;
define HypMinFlag "@P.LEXNAME.Root@" ;

read regex [ 
A -> a,
B -> b,
C -> c,
D -> d,
E -> e,
F -> f,
G -> g,
H -> h,
I -> i,
J -> j,
K -> k,
L -> l,
M -> m,
N -> n,
O -> o,
P -> p,
Q -> q,
R -> r,
S -> s,
T -> t,
U -> u,
V -> v,
W -> w,
X -> x,
Y -> y,
Z -> z,
Á -> á,
Č -> č,
Đ -> đ,
Ŋ -> ŋ,
Š -> š,
Ŧ -> ŧ,
Ž -> ž
|| .#. ( HYPMINFLAG ) FLAG (compoundtag)*       _ ,
                      FLAG (compoundtag)* ?* %- _

# ---- ends here: ------

# The lower context fixes issue when downcasing words like Davvi-Suopma
# -> davvi-suopmelaš

# Kept for reference: The old version, i.e., 
# The Book's treatment of paloaltolainen and pariisilainen, p. 368 ff.
# Allow optional initial downcasing after @U.Cap.Opt@ 
#A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, 
#F (->) f, G (->) g, H (->) h, I (->) i, J (->) j, 
#K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o, 
#P (->) p, Q (->) q, R (->) r, S (->) s, T (->) t, 
#U (->) u, V (->) v, W (->) w, X (->) x, Y (->) y, 
#Z (->) z, Á (->) á,
#Č (->) č, Đ (->) đ, Ŋ (->) ŋ, Š (->) š, Ŧ (->) ŧ, Ž (->) ž
#|| .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ 
#.o. 
# No uppercase in the middle of a downcasable word
#A->a, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h,
#I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, P->p,
#Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, V->v, W->w, X->x,
#Y->y, Z->z  || %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _
#.o. 
# Eliminate internal spaces inside a downcasable word 
# Spaces are indicated here with the literal 
# underscore character 
#%_  -> [] || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _ 

] ;

substitute defined Flag       for FLAG
substitute defined HypMinFlag for HYPMINFLAG
